Idaho, session 2026, S1317.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 3, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-321, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-321. REGIONAL SERVICE CENTERS. (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Idaho school districts and public charter schools face persistent
challenges in recruiting, retaining, and sustaining highly specialized
personnel required to educate an increasingly complex student body.
This is especially problematic for noninstructional staff required un-
der the individuals with disabilities education act (IDEA), including
psychologists, speech-language pathologists, behavior specialists,
occupational and physical therapists, and special education adminis-
trators.
(b) These challenges contribute to uneven service delivery, dupli-
cation of administrative structures, increased costs, and heightened
risk of federal noncompliance under IDEA general supervision require-
ments.
(c) Regional service centers can aid local education agencies in areas
of accounting, finance, human resources, recruitment, professional de-
velopment, and information technology services.
(d) Using shared, regional service delivery models, controlled by par-
ticipating local education agencies and supported by predictable state
funding, can reduce duplication, improve compliance, strengthen work-
force pipelines, and preserve local control.
(e) Idaho requires a cooperative, voluntary framework that en-
ables local education agencies to pool resources for high-cost and
hard-to-staff services while maintaining enrollment, instructional
authority, legal responsibilities, and governance at the local level.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Board" means a regional service center board.
(b) "Contracted services" means additional services offered by an RSC
on a fee-for-service basis, elected by participating LEAs and outlined
under a service-level agreement, memorandum of agreement, or an inter-
local agreement pursuant to section 67-2332, Idaho Code.


(c) "Core services" means services supported by appropriated baseline
state funding to provide for administrative support of RSCs.
(d) "Individualized education program" or "IEP" means a program devel-
oped collaboratively by a student's IEP team that outlines the special
education program for a student with a disability, including special-
ized instruction and related services.
(e) "Local education agency" or "LEA" means school districts and public
charter schools that are not part of a school district.
(f) "Participating LEA" means a school district or public charter
school that has entered into an interlocal agreement with an RSC.
(g) "Regional service center" or "RSC" means a voluntary, cooperative
public entity supporting two (2) or more LEAs through an interlocal
agreement for the purpose of providing shared educational and adminis-
trative services.
(3)(a) A prospective RSC shall provide a governing charter and appli-
cation to establish a new RSC to the state superintendent of public in-
struction.
(b) The charter and application shall specify the proposed:
(i) Geographic service region;
(ii) Governance structure, including board officers;
(iii) Services to be provided;
(iv) Procedures for LEA participation and withdrawal;
(v) Rules to modify or amend the charter governing such RSC; and
(vi) Fiscal management and accountability.
(4) Upon the state superintendent of public instruction's approval of
a prospective RSC's charter and application, a board for that RSC shall be
established, which shall be vested with the authority, control, and super-
vision of the RSC and its service programs and which shall have the powers
required to perform the duties set forth in this section. Each RSC charter
shall designate its board, which shall consist of at least two (2) superin-
tendents or charter administrators, or their designees, from LEAs receiving
contracted services from the RSC. The superintendent of public instruction
shall appoint one (1) additional member to the board who:
(a) Shall not vote on board matters, except in order to break a tied
vote;
(b) Shall ensure compliance with this section; and
(c) Shall report the decisions of the board to the superintendent of
public instruction.
(5) RSC boards shall have and may exercise the following powers and du-
ties:
(a) To hire staff as necessary to complete the board's mission as out-
lined in this section.
(i) Staff requiring certification shall be properly certified
and endorsed for the service being rendered pursuant to section
33-1201, Idaho Code.
(ii) All staff working for an RSC shall be eligible for the public
employee retirement system pursuant to chapter 13, title 59, Idaho
Code.


(iii) Staff working for an RSC shall maintain their career ladder
and experience growth as if they were employed directly by an LEA
pursuant to section 33-1004B, Idaho Code;
(b) To cooperate or enter into contracts or agreements to provide ser-
vices or do such other things as specified in the agreement, subject
to the limitations described in this subsection. An agreement entered
into pursuant to this paragraph may be between the superintendent of
public instruction, institutions of higher education, and one (1) LEA
or multiple LEAs. The board may enter into agreements to render ser-
vices to or for agencies in exchange for a charge reasonably calculated
to cover the cost of rendering such service. This authority is to be
limited to services voluntarily rendered and voluntarily received;
(c) To determine the location of its main office and to determine the
location of branch offices, if any. Services are encouraged to be pro-
vided in person to the maximum reasonable extent for student-oriented
or staff-oriented positions;
(d) To deposit all moneys or payment received or collected by gift,
grant, devise, or any other way to the respective division or subaccount
of the RSC;
(e) To establish a fiscal control policy;
(f) To purchase, exchange, or sell real property and construct, rent,
or lease such buildings as may be required for the accomplishment of
the duties imposed on the RSC and to further obtain such other personal
property as may be necessary to its functions;
(g) To accept, receive, and utilize any gifts, grants, or funds and per-
sonal and real property that may be donated to it for the fulfillment of
the purposes outlined in this section; and
(h) To establish a charge whereby the board agrees to render services to
or for education entities for an amount reasonably calculated to cover
the cost of rendering such services.
(6) For the purposes of this section, an RSC is not a subdivision of the
state and shall be considered an independent body corporate and politic pur-
suant to section 1, article VIII of the constitution of the state of Idaho and
is not authorized hereby to levy taxes or to obligate the state of Idaho con-
cerning such financing.
(7) Neither the board nor the staff of an RSC has any authority or powers
over curriculum, instruction, or student enrollment, which shall remain the
responsibility of each LEA.
(8) RSCs shall receive funding administered by the department of educa-
tion, subject to legislative appropriations, for the administration of the
RSCs. Nothing in this section shall be construed to create an entitlement to
funding or to obligate the state to provide ongoing financial support. Funds
appropriated pursuant to this section shall be separate from and shall not
modify, supplant, or replace distributions made pursuant to the Idaho public
school funding formula. Baseline funding shall cover core services and ad-
ministrative operations that include but are not limited to:
(a) Supporting workforce recruitment, training, and retention initia-
tives aligned with statewide needs;
(b) Supporting shared instructional and noninstructional services,
including special education technical assistance and related supports;


(c) Supporting IDEA compliance, monitoring, and technical assistance;
(d) Providing training and technical assistance to improve compliance
with federal and state requirements;
(e) Offsetting administrative and operational costs necessary to de-
liver regional services efficiently; and
(f) Reducing contracted service costs charged to participating LEAs.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 3, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-322, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-322. REGIONAL SERVICE CENTER CONTRACTS FUND. (1) There is hereby
established in the state treasury the regional service center contracts fund
to be administered by regional service centers.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Legislative appropriations;
(b) Donations and contributions made to the fund;
(c) Interest earned on idle moneys in the fund; and
(d) Moneys received for contracts authorized pursuant to section
33-321(5)(b), Idaho Code.
(3) Moneys in the fund shall be used exclusively to finance fee-for-
services program costs outlined in memorandums of agreement or interlocal
agreements authorized pursuant to section 33-321, Idaho Code, and are hereby
continuously appropriated for such purposes.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.